Maryland, session 2025, HB0986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–147.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NEW TEACHER” MEANS A TEACHER WHO HAS TAUGHT
FOR LESS THAN 2 3 COMPLETE SCHOOL YEARS.
(B) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A NEW TEACHER
RETENTION PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF A NEW TEACHER RETENTION PROGRAM IS TO
PROVIDE SUPPORT TO NEW TEACHERS TO ENSURE THAT NEW TEACHERS CONTINUE
TO BE MOTIVATED AND RETAIN THEIR PASSION TO TEACH.
(C) A NEW TEACHER RETENTION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE NEW TEACHERS IN THE COUNTY WITH REGULAR
COHORT–BASED OPPORTUNITIES TO SHARE EXPERIENCES AND LESSONS LEARNED
ON THE JOB;
(2) ASSIGN AN EXPERIENCED TEACHER TO EACH NEW TEACHER
COHORT TO PROVIDE OVERSIGHT AND GUIDANCE FOR THE COHORT;
(3) ASSIGN EACH NEW TEACHER TO A HIGHLY COMPETENT TEACHER
MENTOR IN THE COUNTY, WHO COULD BE A RETIRED TEACHER, TO PROVIDE
SUPPORT AND INFORMATION AT THE SCHOOL OF THE NEW TEACHER;
(4) SURVEY NEW TEACHERS ON THEIR TEACHING CHALLENGES AND
SCHOOL CLIMATE;
(5) PROVIDE PRINCIPALS WITH THE RESOURCES AND SUPPORT
NEEDED TO HELP NEW TEACHERS IN THEIR SCHOOLS SUCCEED IN THEIR FIRST
YEARS OF TEACHING AND REMAIN TEACHING AT THEIR SCHOOLS; AND
(6) INCORPORATE THE GUIDELINES DEVELOPED BY THE STATE
BOARD UNDER § 6–119 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 986 3
(D) IN ESTABLISHING A PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION, A COUNTY BOARD
SHALL PRIORITIZE ADDRESSING ISSUES FACED BY NEW TEACHERS:
(1) FROM A DIVERSE BACKGROUND; AND
(2) IN SCHOOLS OR TEACHING SUBJECT AREAS WITH HIGH RATES OF
TEACHER TURNOVER.
(E) (1) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL COMPENSATE PROVIDE SUPPLEMENTAL
COMPENSATION TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WHO OVERSEES A NEW TEACHER
COHORT OR SERVES AS A TEACHER MENTOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH A TEACHER
RETENTION PROGRAM THROUGH ADDITIONAL PAY OR PAID LEAVE PLANNING TIME.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, A COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE
SUPPLEMENTAL COMPENSATION TO A RETIRED TEACHER WHO SERVES AS A
TEACHER MENTOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH A TEACHER RETENTION PROGRAM.
6–119.
(a) The State Board shall develop guidelines for [an incentive program to
encourage] public school systems to:
(1) Adopt a teacher support system that provides year–long assistance and
support to teachers [through a teacher consulting program in which consulting teachers
are fully trained and apply rigorous teaching standards]; and
(2) Improve teacher retention during the first 5 years of service.
(b) In developing the guidelines under subsection (a) of this section, the State
Board shall [conduct]:
(1) INCORPORATE RESEARCH ON SUCCESSFUL APPROACHES TO
RETAINING NEW TEACHERS AND KEEPING NEW TEACHERS MOTIVATED;
(2) ANALYZE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE MARYLAND
EDUCATOR RECRUITMENT, RETENTION, AND DIVERSITY DASHBOARD UNDER §
6–128 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO DEVELOP STRATEGIES TO SUPPORT THE MOST
VULNERABLE TEACHERS;
(3) EXAMINE ISSUES FACED BY TEACHERS FROM A DIVERSE
BACKGROUND AND THE POLICIES NECESSARY TO PRESERVE A TEACHING
WORKFORCE THAT REFLECTS THE DIVERSITY OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS IN
THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 986
(4) ADDRESS THE UNIQUE NEEDS OF TEACHERS IN SCHOOLS OR WHO
TEACH SUBJECTS WITH HIGH RATES OF TEACHER TURNOVER; AND
(5) CONDUCT an assessment of the advisability and feasibility of
providing [competitive grants] SUPPORT to county boards, INCLUDING THROUGH
COMPETITIVE GRANTS, PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT, AND SUSTAINED
PROGRAMMATIC SUPPORT, to assist in the development and implementation of a teacher
support [incentive] program.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, if money becomes available, the
Governor include an appropriation in the State budget for grants for teacher support
[incentive] programs established in accordance with the guidelines developed under this
section.
6–128.
(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2025, the Department shall establish and
maintain a Maryland Educator Recruitment, Retention, and Diversity Dashboard.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Dashboard shall include
demographic information and key data points regarding:
(i) Certificated and noncertificated personnel in public schools; and
(ii) Prospective educators within teacher preparation programs
throughout the State who are participating in teacher internships.
(3) (i) The Dashboard may not include any demographic information
that could be used to identify specific individuals.
(ii) Any demographic that is less than 5% of the relevant population
may be reported simply as “< 5%”.
(b) (1) On or before December 1, 2024, and each December 1 thereafter, each
county board shall report to the Department demographic and job status information on
educators employed by, and teacher interns placed in, the public schools within the
jurisdiction of the county board during the previous school year.
(2) Each county board shall report the information required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection disaggregated by:
(i) School;
(ii) Gender;
(iii) Race;

HOUSE BILL 986 5
(iv) Ethnicity;
(v) Average length of service;
(vi) Status on the career ladder established under § 6–1002 of this
title;
(vii) Number of educators hired during the reporting period; and
(viii) Attrition rates of educators during the reporting period.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2026, the
State Board of Education shall update the teacher support and retention guidelines
required under § 6–119 of the Education Article as enacted under Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.